South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4301.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 23, Chapter 5, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 56-5-2956. (A) In order to operate a motor vehicle in this State, a person who is convicted of violating Section 56-5-2930 or 56-5-2933 must maintain for one year an automobile liability insurance policy that contains, at a minimum, the following: (1) two-hundred and fifty thousand dollars for bodily injury to one person in any one accident and, subject to the limit for one person; (2) five hundred thousand dollars for bodily injury to two or more persons in any one accident; and (3) two hundred fifty thousand dollars for injury to or destruction of property of others in any one accident. (B) Proof of financial responsibility required by this section must be filed by the insurance carrier with the Department of Motor Vehicles. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----